Mississippi statutes. Title 45. Public Safety and Good Order
Reports of Gunshots and Knifings

§ 45-9-31.
Medical personnel required to report injuries from gunshots, knifings, and hunting or boating accidents.

Any physician, surgeon, dentist, veterinarian, paramedical employee, or nurse, or any employee of a hospital, clinic, or any other medical institution or office where patients regularly receive care, who treats, at any location, any human being suffering from a wound or injury and who has reason to believe or ought to know that the wound or injury was caused by gunshot or knifing, or receiving a request for such treatment, shall report the same immediately to the municipal police department or sheriff’s office of the municipality or county in which such treatment is administered or request for such treatment is received. If the wound or injury is the result of a hunting or boating accident, the injury shall be reported immediately to the Mississippi Department of Wildlife, Fisheries and Parks.

Any person making a report or the reports required by this section shall be immune from civil liability for the making of the said reports.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7015-41; Laws, 1972, ch. 530, § 1; Laws, 2002, ch. 365, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2002.